test/src/morphology/N-kultuur_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kultūr: # Noun 130 'eng /est kultuur/fin' - full paradigm
     kultūr+N+Sg+Nom: kultūr
     kultūr+N+Sg+Gen: kultūr
     kultūr+N+Sg+Par: kultūrõ
     kultūr+N+Sg+Dat: kultūrõn
     kultūr+N+Sg+Ins: kultūrõks
     kultūr+N+Sg+Ill: kultūrõ
     kultūr+N+Sg+Ela: kultūrst
     kultūr+N+Pl+Nom: kultūrõd
     kultūr+N+Pl+Gen: kultūrõd
     kultūr+N+Pl+Par: kultūridi
     kultūr+N+Pl+Dat: kultūrõdõn
     kultūr+N+Pl+Ins: kultūrõdõks
     kultūr+N+Pl+Ill: kultūriž
     kultūr+N+Pl+Ela: kultūrist
